src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!fed by inverse negation, inverse no negation, direct no negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET
@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_LOCAL_GATEWAY ;
@R.Person.2@    VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_ILESS ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_3 ;!pick up waa
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY ;!pick up nothing
@R.Theme.Inv@     VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB ;!own slot (maybe own file!), extra options for inverse-marked forms
!new flag

!{first person "I-full" plurality 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_LOCAL_GATEWAY 
!what exactly is driving me to diverge from a strict mirroring of graphviz?
!feature style, and whether incoming arcs in graphviz read different strings
+1Pl:minaa    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ;
                VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL_INV_GET;
                VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY ;

!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct plural negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL_INV_GET
@R.Theme.Inv@@P.Inanimate.1@   VTA_INDEP_INVISIBLE_INAN ; !inanimate subs aren't obviously marked here, but it is really convenient to mark them in the tags
                VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INVISIBLE_INAN
+%0:0   VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL 
!style should include recommendations for marking when predication info is being collapsed
+1Pl:naan2y1 VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET ;
+1Pl:min2    VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET "weight: 1" ; !catching dialect variants mentioned in baraga, and appearing especially in Parry Island 
+1Pl:minaa     VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 
!new tag
!} I-full end

!{second person "I-less" plurality 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_ILESS
+2Pl:waa  VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY ;
!new tag

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY 
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ;
    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_NON_3 ;
!} I-less end

!{first or second person singular
!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct singular negation

!note, identical to VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY
!LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_1_2_SINGULAR_GATEWAY 
!    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 
!    VTA_INDEP_SINGULAR_PERIPH ; 

!{third person number 
!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct plural negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_3
+2Pl:waa  VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY ;

!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct singular negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 
    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3OBV ;
!} 3 num end

!probably a good idea to keep a list of the sub-lexicon calls out of a slot

!#####
!#Mode Slot
!#####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY
+Dub:dig    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_GET ;
+Prt:ban2i1   VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_GET ;

!#####
!#Periph Slot
!#####

!{ periph
!{ gate-keeping for some earlier suffixes
!{first person pl/inclusive naan 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET
@R.Theme.Inv@@R.Inanimate@  VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL ; !/an/->[in]
@D.Inanimate@               VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3PL ; !/ag/->[ig]/naan_
# ; !3rd person singular/obv

!} naan-periph end

!!careful! negation can't be last in word, n inserted then!

!{dubitative 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_GET
@D.Inanimate@       VTA_INDEP_DUB_ANIM_GET ;
@R.Inanimate@               VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_ANIM_GET
@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_NON_3 ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_3 ;
@R.Theme.Inv@     VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_INV ;!note, allowing ambiguity

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_NON_3
0:en VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN_GET ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN_GET 
@D.Inanimate@  VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3PL ;  

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_3
0:en    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3OBV ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_INV
0:en    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN 
0:en    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL ;
#;

!} dub end

!{preterit 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_GET 
@D.Inanimate@   VTA_INDEP_PRT_ANIM_GET ; 
@R.Inanimate@   VTA_INDEP_PRT_INAN ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRT_ANIM_GET 
@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_NON_3 ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_3 ;
@R.Theme.Inv@     VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_INV ;!note, allowing ambiguity

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_NON_3
@D.Inanimate@   VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3PL ; 
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_3 
VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3OBV ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRT_PERIPH_INV 
VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRT_INAN 
VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL ;
#;
!} prt end
!} gate-keeping end

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3PL
+3Pl:%>ag # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_3OBV
+3Obv:%>an # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PERIPH_INAN_PL 
+%0Pl:%>an # ;
!} periph end

!#####
!#Inanimate Subjects 
!#careful! inverse forms with naan are ambiguous between inan sub and 3 sub!
!#they are not tracked into this area
!#####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB
+%0:n VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SET 
@P.Inanimate.1@ VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_GET
@D.Person.1@    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL ;!should pl be specified here?
@R.Negation@@R.Person.3@ VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV_NEG ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV ;
                VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SG_OBJ ;

!##Number
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SG_OBJ 
0:aa    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;
+%0Pl:an # ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV_NEG 
+3Obv:ini   #;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV 
!-in here is the marking obv when periph can't ... -an in periph is inan agr!
+3Obv:inaa VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL
+2Pl:aawaa    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL_GATEWAY;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL_GATEWAY
+%0Pl:an #;
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;
#;

!} inan sub end
!} indep end

LEXICON VTA_PREORDER_GET
@D.Order.Cnj@   VTA_INDEP_THEME_GET ;
@D.Person@      VTA_NON_INDEP_GET ;
                VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE ;

LEXICON VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE
+ThmPas+VAI:igoo    VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_IGOO_GET ; !takes 1,2 prefixes in indep order
+ThmPas+VAI+Cnj:0   VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_NULL_GET ;!takes special 3rd person suffixes ind+waa
+ThmPas+VAI:aa      VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_AA_GET ; !never takes person prefixes IIRC

LEXICON VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_IGOO_GET
@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Order.Cnj@    VAI_INDEP_NEG ; !first or second person prefixes legal in independent order. Since person is being required, and person is only assigned by prefixes, and cnj does not allow prefixes, the check for cnj is probably redundant (formerly check was just denying 3, which left cnj's able to creep in)
@D.Person@                   VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_IGOO_CNJ ; 

LEXICON VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_IGOO_CNJ
+Cnj:c1         THMPAS_CNJ_LOCAL_SET ; 

LEXICON VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_NULL_GET
@D.Person@  VAI_PASSIVE_3 ; 

LEXICON VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE_AA_GET
@D.Person@      VAI_INDEP_NEG ; 
@D.Person@      THMPAS_NON_LOCAL_NEG_SET ; !would be nice to just send this to conjunct order VAI, but there is the null thmpas in conjuct order for third persons, and consequent suffix restrictions. Not sure how much overlap there is otherwise with standard VAI conjunct suffixes

!LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PASSIVE_FLAG
!!needed for 3rd person passives (independent order) to not pick up -m (+X VAI infl) ... are we sure they can't be further passivized?
!@P.Passive.1@ VAI_INDEP_GET ; 

LEXICON VTA_NON_INDEP_GET
+Cnj:0 VTA_CNJ_THM ; !semi-compressed prefix tree of BRUTE
!+Cnj:0  VTA_CNJ_BRUTE ; !brute-force listing 
@D.Order.Cnj@   VTA_IMPER_TAG ;
